Maryland, session 2025, HB1546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
6–202.
Notwithstanding § 6–201(a) [or], § 6–203, OR § 6–204 of this subtitle, for the
purpose of enforcing the civil or criminal laws of the State, the Governor may enter into an
agreement with the United States to establish full or partial concurrent jurisdiction of the
State and the United States over any land in the State held by the United States.
6–204.
FOR DELINQUENT FEDERAL FUNDS AS DETERMINED UNDER § 10–208 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE STATE RESERVES
JURISDICTION WITH RESPECT TO LAND THAT THE UNITED STATES OR ANY UNIT OF
THE UNITED STATES LEASES OR OTHERWISE HOLDS IN THE STATE WHEN THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IS FOUND NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH COURT DECISIONS
UPHOLDING FEDERAL CONGRESSIONALLY APPROVED SPENDING.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3–206.
(a) The Attorney General is legal adviser to the Department.
(b) (1) With the advice of the Secretary, the Attorney General shall assign at
least 1 assistant Attorney General to the Central Collection Unit.

HOUSE BILL 1546 3
(2) At the request of the Governor, the Attorney General shall assign to the
Department:
(i) at least 1 assistant Attorney General; and
(ii) any other assistant Attorneys General authorized by law to be
assigned to the Department.
(d) Each assistant Attorney General who is assigned to the Central Collection
Unit shall devote full time to the duties with that Unit and may have no other duties.
3–302.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section,
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection, or in other law, the Central Collection Unit is
responsible for the collection of each delinquent account or other debt that is owed to the
State or any of its officials or units.
(D) THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
COLLECTION OF DELINQUENT FEDERAL FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–304 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, § 10–208 OF THIS ARTICLE, AND § 6–204 OF THE GENERAL
PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
3–304.
(a) In carrying out its responsibilities, the Central Collection Unit may:
(1) (i) institute, in its name, any action that is available under State
law for collection of a debt or claim; or
(ii) without suit, settle the debt or claim;
(2) for all debts or claims collected on or after June 1, 1992:
(i) in addition to the outstanding principal and interest, assess and
collect from the debtor a fee, which may not exceed 20% of the outstanding principal and
interest, sufficient to cover all collection and administrative costs; and
(ii) prior to crediting any amount to any agency which refers a debt
for any purpose, withhold a fee sufficient to cover all collection and administrative costs;
(3) waive or reduce any fee assessed under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
[and]

HOUSE BILL 1546
(4) certify a debt or claim and the debtor responsible for the debt or claim
to:
(i) the Comptroller for income tax refund interception in accordance
with Title 13, Subtitle 9 of the Tax – General Article; and
(ii) the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency for State lottery
prize interception in accordance with § 3–307 of this subtitle; AND
(5) IN THE EVENT OF FEDERAL NONCOMPLIANCE WITH COURT
DECISIONS UPHOLDING CONGRESSIONALLY APPROVED SPENDING, AND IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, PLACE LIENS ON FEDERAL
PROPERTY IN THE STATE.
(b) In addition to the authority provided under subsection (a) of this section, and
notwithstanding that the Central Collection Unit is a unit of the State government and
that assistant Attorneys General represent the Unit, the Unit may enforce a statutory or
written contractual obligation of a debtor to pay costs in addition to principal, including
collection costs, counsel fees, or interest penalties.
10–101.
In this title, “Board” means the Board of Public Works.
10–208.
THE BOARD MAY DETERMINE THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT TO BE
DELINQUENT IN FEDERAL FUNDS OWED TO THE STATE IN THE EVENT OF FEDERAL
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH COURT DECISIONS UPHOLDING CONGRESSIONALLY
APPROVED SPENDING.
Article – State Government
6–106.1.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) the federal government’s action or failure to take action may pose a
threat to the health and welfare of the residents of the State; and
(2) the State should investigate and obtain relief from any arbitrary,
unlawful, or unconstitutional federal action or inaction and prevent such action or inaction
from harming the residents of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for

HOUSE BILL 1546 5
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.